Utah statutes.
58-56-15.   Factory built housing and modular units -- Division responsibility -- Unlawful conduct.

(1)  The division:

(a)  shall maintain current information on the HUD code and the state construction code relevant to manufactured housing installation and will provide at reasonable cost the information to compliance agencies, local regulators, or state regulators requesting such information;

(b)  shall provide qualified personnel to advise compliance agencies, local regulators, and state regulators regarding the standards for construction and set-up, construction and set-up inspection, and additions or modifications to factory built housing;

(c)  is designated as the state administrative agency for purposes under the provisions of the HUD code;

(d)  may inspect the work of modular unit manufacturers in the state during the construction process to determine compliance of the manufacturer with this chapter for those units to be installed within the state and upon a finding of substantive deficiency, issue a corrective order to the manufacturer with a copy to the local regulator in the state's political subdivision in which the unit is to be installed;

(e)  shall have rights of entry and inspection as specified under the HUD Code; and

(f)  shall implement by rule as required by the HUD Code:

(i)  a dispute resolution program; and

(ii)  a continuing education requirement for manufactured housing installation contractors.

(2)  The division may assess civil penalties payable to the state for violation of the HUD Code in an amount identical to those set forth in Section 611 of the National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 5410.

(3)  The state may impose criminal sanctions for violations of the HUD Code identical to those set forth in Section 611 of the National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 5410, provided that if the criminal sanction is a fine, the fine shall be payable to the state.

